Missouri, session 2026, SB1000.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 620.467, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 620.467,
to read as follows:
620.467. 1. [The state treasurer shall annually
deposit an amount prescribed in this section out of the
general revenue fund pursuant to section 144.700, in a fund]
There is hereby created in the state treasury a fund, to be
known as the "Division of Tourism Supplemental Revenue
Fund", which shall consist of all moneys appropriated to it
by the general assembly, and also any gifts, contributions,
grants, or bequests received from federal, private, or other
sources. The state treasurer shall administer the fund, and
the moneys in such fund[, except the appropriate percentage
of any refund made of taxes collected under the provisions
of chapter 144,] shall be used solely by the division of
tourism of the department of economic development to carry
out the duties and functions of the division as prescribed
by law. [Moneys deposited in the division of tourism
supplemental revenue fund shall be in addition to a budget
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SS SB 1000 2
base in each fiscal year. For fiscal year 1994, such budget
base shall be six million two hundred thousand dollars, and
in each succeeding fiscal year the budget base shall be the
prior fiscal year's general revenue base plus any additional
appropriations made to the division of tourism, including
one hundred percent of the prior fiscal year's deposits made
to the division of tourism supplemental revenue fund
pursuant to this section. The general revenue base shall
decrease by ten percent in each fiscal year following fiscal
year 1994.] Notwithstanding the provisions of section
33.080 to the contrary, moneys in the division of tourism
supplemental revenue fund at the end of any biennium shall
not be deposited to the credit of the general revenue fund.
2. [In fiscal years 1995 to 2020, a portion of general
revenue determined pursuant to this subsection shall be
deposited to the credit of the division of tourism
supplemental revenue fund pursuant to subsection 1 of this
section. The director of revenue shall determine the amount
deposited to the credit of the division of tourism
supplemental revenue fund in each fiscal year by computing
the previous year's total appropriation into the division of
tourism supplemental revenue fund and adding to such
appropriation amount the total amount derived from the
retail sale of tourist-oriented goods and services collected
pursuant to the following sales taxes: state sales taxes;
sales taxes collected pursuant to sections 144.010 to
144.430 that are designated as local tax revenue to be
deposited in the school district trust fund pursuant to
section 144.701; sales taxes collected pursuant to Section
43(a) of Article IV of the Missouri Constitution; and sales
taxes collected pursuant to Section 47(a) of Article IV of
the Missouri Constitution. If the increase in such sales

SS SB 1000 3
taxes derived from the retail sale of tourist-oriented goods
and services in the fiscal year three years prior to the
fiscal year in which each deposit shall be made is at least
three percent over such sales taxes derived from the retail
sale of tourist-oriented goods and services generated in the
fiscal year four years prior to the fiscal year in which
each deposit shall be made, an amount equal to one-half of
such sales taxes generated above a three percent increase
shall be calculated by the director of revenue and the
amount calculated shall be deposited by the state treasurer
to the credit of the division of tourism supplemental
revenue fund.
3. Total deposits in the supplemental revenue fund in
any fiscal year pursuant to subsections 1 and 2 of this
section shall not exceed the amount deposited into the
division of tourism supplemental revenue fund in the fiscal
year immediately preceding the current fiscal year by more
than three million dollars.
4. As used in this section, "sales of tourism-oriented
goods and services" are those sales by businesses registered
with the department of revenue under the following SIC Codes:
(1) SIC Code 5811;
(2) SIC Code 5812;
(3) SIC Code 5813;
(4) SIC Code 7010;
(5) SIC Code 7020;
(6) SIC Code 7030;
(7) SIC Code 7033;
(8) SIC Code 7041;
(9) SIC Code 7920;
(10) SIC Code 7940;
(11) SIC Code 7990;

SS SB 1000 4
(12) SIC Code 7991;
(13) SIC Code 7992;
(14) SIC Code 7996;
(15) SIC Code 7998;
(16) SIC Code 7999; and
(17) SIC Code 8420.
5.] Prior to each appropriation from the division of
tourism supplemental revenue fund, the division of tourism
shall present to the special committee on tourism[,
recreational and cultural affairs] of the house of
representatives and to the [transportation and tourism]
economic and workforce development committee of the senate,
or their successors, a promotional marketing strategy
including, but not limited to, targeted markets, duration of
market plans, ensuing market strategies, and the actual and
estimated investment return, if any, resulting therefrom.
[6. This section shall become effective July 1, 1994.
This section shall expire June 30, 2020.]
✓